Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.240

Chapter to be liberally construed. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that traffic in stolen private metal property or nonferrous metal property may be prevented, and irresponsible, unreliable, or dishonest persons may be prevented from engaging in the business of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state and reliable persons may be encouraged to engage in businesses of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state.

[ 2013 c 322 s 28.]

PDFRCW 19.290.240

Chapter to be liberally construed. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that traffic in stolen commercial metal property and nonferrous metal property may be prevented, and irresponsible, unreliable, or dishonest persons may be prevented from engaging in the business of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state and reliable persons may be encouraged to engage in businesses of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state.

[ 2024 c 301 s 11; 2013 c 322 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.